Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB125.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 200 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Behavioral assessment" means an evaluation of a child by a clinical
professional, which may occur in person, remotely, or through the review of
clinical records;
(b) "Clinical professional" means a licensed clinician employed by, or
associated with, an inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching
hospital, who is qualified to make a clinical determination whether a child
meets criteria for admission to an inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric
teaching hospital for inpatient psychiatric care;
(c) "Department" means the Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities;
(d) "High acuity youth" means a child who has been determined by a clinical
professional, following a behavioral assessment, to need an environment
and specialized treatment capable of addressing manifest aggression,
violence toward persons, or property destruction;
(e) "Inpatient psychiatric hospital" means a hospital, other than a state mental
hospital, that is licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 216B to provide inpatient
psychiatric services; and
(f) "Pediatric teaching hospital" has the same meaning as in KRS 205.565.
(2) A child who is charged with a public offense or subject to a court order to receive
inpatient psychiatric treatment pursuant to the Kentucky Unified Juvenile Code
shall, prior to being admitted to an inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric
teaching hospital, undergo a behavioral assessment by a clinical professional to
Page 1 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
determine whether the child qualifies as a high acuity youth.
(3) (a) If a clinical professional determines that the child qualifies as a high acuity
youth following a behavioral assessment, the clinical professional shall
contact the:
1. Designated representative of the department or other designated
representative of the cabinet; and
2. Designated representative of the Department of Juvenile Justice;
to discuss the immediate treatment plan for the child.
(b) The clinical professional shall prepare an affidavit, with any documents in
support of the affidavit, for submission to the department, the Department
of Juvenile Justice, and the court. The affidavit shall include:
1. A summary of the clinical evidence that the clinical professional relied
upon for the determination that the child qualifies as a high acuity
youth;
2. A recommendation of the appropriate location for any recommended
treatment services for the high acuity youth and the basis for the
recommendation, based upon the child's needs and the capabilities of
the inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching hospital, or
whether treatment on an outpatient basis may be provided at a
detention facility for a child in the custody of the Department of
Juvenile Justice or at a location specified by the department if the
child is in the custody of the cabinet; and
3. Contact information from the inpatient psychiatric hospital or
pediatric teaching hospital for one (1) or more clinical professionals
who can provide the types of services for the high acuity youth at a
detention facility or location designated by the department if it is
determined in the best interests of the child that the child should
Page 2 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
receive psychiatric services other than inpatient treatment services.
(4) (a) If the representative of the department and the representative of the
Department of Juvenile Justice agree with the recommendations of the
clinical professional, a conference affidavit establishing an initial treatment
plan shall be submitted to the court on a form provided by the
Administrative Office of the Courts within twenty-four (24) hours of the
delivery of the initial affidavit under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) If the representative of the department and the representative of the
Department of Juvenile Justice do not agree to the treatment
recommendations of the clinical professional, either party or both parties
shall submit an affidavit of dissent to the court on a form provided by the
Administrative Office of the Courts that states the clinical basis for the
objection, and may include a recommendation for an alternate plan, facility,
or assessment. The dissenting affidavit shall be signed by a physician who
can speak directly to the clinical basis for submitting the dissenting
affidavit.
(5) Following submission of a conference affidavit or an affidavit of dissent, the
court shall enter an order regarding the course of treatment or may schedule a
hearing to determine a treatment plan for the high acuity youth.
(6) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the court shall not order a high
acuity youth for inpatient treatment within an inpatient psychiatric hospital or
pediatric teaching hospital without agreement of the hospital, the department,
and the Department of Juvenile Justice unless the court determines by clear and
convincing evidence that the inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching
hospital has the resources and capabilities to treat the high acuity youth in a
manner that does not pose a danger to the high acuity youth or the hospital's
patients and staff. This subsection shall not be construed to require an inpatient
Page 3 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching hospital to admit a child if doing so
would be in violation of federal law.
(7) (a) If the treatment plan approved or ordered by the court involves the
admission of a high acuity youth to an inpatient psychiatric hospital or
pediatric teaching hospital, then the provision of inpatient services by the
inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching hospital shall be
reimbursed by the Department of Medicaid Services at no less than two
hundred percent (200%) of the then current inpatient psychiatric hospital's
or pediatric teaching hospital's Medicaid inpatient rate to account for the
acuity and intensity of health care items and services necessary for
treatment of high acuity youth, the provisions of KRS 202A.271
notwithstanding.
(b) For any admission under this subsection, the inpatient psychiatric hospital
or pediatric teaching hospital shall provide:
1. An updated treatment plan in addition to the initial treatment plan, if
needed, within ten (10) days from the filing of the initial affidavit; and
2. Status reports to the department or the Department of Juvenile
Justice, as applicable, upon request or as ordered by the court.
(c) Any dispute that arises between the inpatient psychiatric hospital or
pediatric teaching hospital, the department, and the Department of Juvenile
Justice shall be resolved in the manner provided in subsections (3), (4), and
(5) of this section, and any party may request court review at any time
during the period of treatment.
(8) (a) If a high acuity youth is admitted to an inpatient psychiatric hospital or
pediatric teaching hospital for treatment pursuant to a court order issued
under this section, and the high acuity youth commits an act of violence or
incites violence against any of the hospital's patients, staff, or visitors, the
Page 4 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching hospital may file an
affidavit with the department or other designated representative of the
cabinet, or the Department of Juvenile Justice, as applicable, and with the
court, and the youth shall be:
1. Discharged from the hospital; and
2. Immediately returned by the department or the Department of
Juvenile Justice, as applicable, to the youth's last place of custody or
residence unless another location is ordered by the court.
(b) This subsection shall not preclude any person from filing a complaint in
reference to the youth pursuant to KRS 610.020.
(9) If the treatment plan approved or ordered by the court involves the provision of
outpatient psychiatric services to the high acuity youth at the location of a
detention facility, then the department or the Department of Juvenile Justice may
contract with an inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching hospital to
provide the outpatient psychiatric services. The inpatient psychiatric hospital or
pediatric teaching hospital shall be reimbursed by the Department for Medicaid
Services for such outpatient psychiatric services at no less than one hundred fifty
percent (150%) of the then current inpatient psychiatric hospital's or pediatric
teaching hospital's Medicaid reimbursement rate as if such services had been
performed in an inpatient setting, the provisions of KRS 202A.271
notwithstanding.
(10) Each inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric teaching hospital that accepts any
high acuity youth under this section, the cabinet, the department, the Department
of Juvenile Justice, and the Court of Justice shall adopt and provide a protocol
for twenty-four (24) hour access to comply with the requirements of this section.
(11) When a high acuity youth has received residential treatment and the treatment
has improved the youth's condition to a status that the need for continued
Page 5 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
treatment at that facility is no longer medically indicated as determined by the
treating physician:
(a) If the youth has a need for the continuum of care on an inpatient basis in
an inpatient psychiatric hospital, pediatric teaching hospital, or other
inpatient facility equipped to treat a high acuity youth, the Department for
Juvenile Justice, the department, and a representative of the inpatient
psychiatric hospital, pediatric teaching hospital, or other inpatient facility to
which the youth may be transferred shall proceed in accordance with
subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section;
(b) Any additional medical care that the youth may need as part of a continuum
of care that requires a transfer to another facility for treatment shall also
proceed in accordance with subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section; and
(c) As part of the continuum of care, the same representatives from the
department and the Department of Juvenile Justice who have evaluated and
provided treatment and recommendations for the youth shall, to the extent
possible, continue to review the medical treatment of the youth to provide
stability of care with the goal of improving the life and health of the youth.
(12) In the event a child is delivered to an inpatient psychiatric hospital or pediatric
teaching hospital for a behavioral assessment without referral by the department,
the cabinet, or the Department of Juvenile Justice, the clinical professional may
present the affidavit referenced in subsection (3) of this section to a law
enforcement officer, a court-designated worker, or a detention alternative
coordinator who shall then return the high acuity youth to the custody of the
custodial agency until such time as a court issues further orders regarding the
appropriate treatment for the high acuity youth. The inpatient psychiatric
hospital or pediatric teaching hospital shall then proceed according to
subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section.
Page 6 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
Section 2. KRS 15A.305 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall[ develop and] administer a
statewide[ detention] program that shall include both preadjudication and
postadjudication facilities for the detention and treatment of children. The
department shall determine the appropriate physical security for each
facility.
(b) The facilities shall include:
1. Facilities for detention;
2. Youth development centers;
3. Group homes;
4. Alternatives to secure detention; and
5. A mental health facility for the treatment of high acuity youth as
defined in Section 1 of this Act, licensed under KRS Chapter 216B,
which shall be a residential treatment facility;
as those terms are defined in Section 3 of this Act.
(c) The department shall provide alternatives to secure detention for children
charged with[ and, as each regional facility is constructed and ready for
occupancy, shall provide for:
(a) The operation of preadjudication detention facilities for children charged with
public offenses; and
(b) The operation of postadjudication detention facilities for children adjudicated
delinquent or found guilty of] public offenses as provided in subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) In each region in which the department currently[Department of Juvenile Justice]
operates or contracts for the operation of a detention facility, or operates or
contracts for the operation of a detention facility in the future, the department
shall develop and administer a program for alternatives to secure detention that
Page 7 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
shall provide for:
(a) The operation of or contracting for the operation of preadjudication
alternatives to secure detention and follow-up programs for juveniles who are
before the court or who enter pretrial diversion or informal adjustment
programs; and
(b) The operation of or contracting for the operation of postadjudication
alternatives to secure detention and follow-up programs, including but not
limited to community-based programs, mentoring, counseling, and other
programs designed to limit the unnecessary use of secure detention and ensure
public safety.
(3) The department shall operate:
(a) For female offenders:
1. At least one (1) female-only detention facility, located in the central
region of the Commonwealth, which shall safely segregate violent
offenders as defined in KRS 439.3401 from nonviolent offenders;
2. As funds are available, a second female-only detention facility, located
in the western region of the Commonwealth, which shall safely
segregate violent offenders as defined in KRS 439.3401 from
nonviolent offenders; and
3. As funds are available, a third female-only facility if an analysis of the
female offender population exceeds the capacity of the facilities
described in subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this paragraph. A third facility
shall safely segregate violent offenders as defined in KRS 439.3401
from nonviolent offenders. The location of a third facility under this
subparagraph shall be in the northern or eastern region of the
Commonwealth, with the precise location to be determined based upon
an analysis of population of female offenders in detention facilities at
Page 8 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
the time according to the county of residence of the offenders; and
(b) For male offenders, a regional model of juvenile detention facilities which
shall safely segregate violent offenders as defined in KRS 439.3401 from
nonviolent offenders.
(4) The department may reassign where a particular child shall be housed based on
safety or security concerns, staffing needs, and classification.
(5) The department shall develop and implement a system to immediately notify the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services when a status offender or child alleged to
be a status offender has been detained for the alleged violation of a valid court
order.
(6)[(4)] The department shall[may], except as provided in KRS 635.060, charge
counties, charter county governments, unified local governments, consolidated
local governments, and urban-county governments a per diem rate set by
administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A[not
to exceed ninety-four dollars ($94)] for lodging juveniles in state-owned or
contracted facilities.
(7)[(5)] Detention rates charged by contracting detention facilities shall not exceed the
rate in effect on July 1, 1997, subject to increases approved by the department.
(8)[(6)] No juvenile detention facility, as defined in KRS 15A.200, shall be taken
over, purchased, or leased by the Commonwealth without prior approval of the
fiscal court or legislative body of the county upon consultation with the jailer in the
county where the facility is located. The county, upon consultation with the jailer,
may enter into contracts with the Commonwealth for the holding, detention, and
transportation of juveniles.
(9)[(7)] (a) The department[Department of Juvenile Justice] shall enter into
sufficient contracts to ensure the availability of institutional treatment for
children with severe emotional disturbance or mental illness as soon as
Page 9 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
practicable.
(b) The department shall contract with one (1) or more inpatient psychiatric
hospitals, pediatric teaching hospitals, or other behavioral health providers
to provide outpatient behavioral health services to children in need of those
services while in a detention facility.
(10)[(8)] The department[Department of Juvenile Justice] shall, for any facility
operated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, require that the facility:
(a) Provide children in crisis who are residing in a juvenile[ detention] facility
access to a mental health professional whose communications with the child
are privileged under the Kentucky Rules of Evidence;
(b) Conduct monthly documented training related to emergency response;
(c) Ensure that appropriate staff working with a child in a secure juvenile
detention facility or a residential treatment facility[detained youth] have
controlled access to, and are properly trained in the use of, appropriate
defensive equipment comparable to that utilized by the Department of
Corrections, including tasers, pepper spray, and shields;
(d) Establish a specially trained emergency response team within each juvenile
detention center and youth development center which shall be trained in
tactics related to emergency response[detention facilities] and engage in
monthly drills as part of emergency response training;
(e) Enter into a memorandum of understanding with local law enforcement for
emergency response and include these agencies in emergency response
trainings;
(f) Be equipped with an alarm that directly communicates an emergency situation
to the local dispatch center; and
(g) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
to implement this subsection.
Page 10 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
Section 3. KRS 600.020 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS Chapters 600 to 645, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Abused or neglected child" means a child whose health or welfare is harmed or
threatened with harm when:
(a) His or her parent, guardian, person in a position of authority or special trust,
as defined in KRS 532.045, or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision of the child:
1. Inflicts or allows to be inflicted upon the child physical or emotional
injury as defined in this section by other than accidental means;
2. Creates or allows to be created a risk of physical or emotional injury as
defined in this section to the child by other than accidental means;
3. Engages in a pattern of conduct that renders the parent incapable of
caring for the immediate and ongoing needs of the child, including but
not limited to parental incapacity due to a substance use disorder as
defined in KRS 222.005;
4. Continuously or repeatedly fails or refuses to provide essential parental
care and protection for the child, considering the age of the child;
5. Commits or allows to be committed an act of sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, or prostitution upon the child;
6. Creates or allows to be created a risk that an act of sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, or prostitution will be committed upon the child;
7. Abandons or exploits the child;
8. Does not provide the child with adequate care, supervision, food,
clothing, shelter, and education or medical care necessary for the child's
well-being when financially able to do so or offered financial or other
means to do so. A parent or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision of the child legitimately practicing the person's religious
Page 11 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
beliefs shall not be considered a negligent parent solely because of
failure to provide specified medical treatment for a child for that reason
alone. This exception shall not preclude a court from ordering necessary
medical services for a child;
9. Fails to make sufficient progress toward identified goals as set forth in
the court-approved case plan to allow for the safe return of the child to
the parent that results in the child remaining committed to the cabinet
and remaining in foster care for fifteen (15) cumulative months out of
forty-eight (48) months; or
10. Commits or allows female genital mutilation as defined in KRS 508.125
to be committed; or
(b) A person twenty-one (21) years of age or older commits or allows to be
committed an act of sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or prostitution upon a
child less than sixteen (16) years of age;
(2) "Age or developmentally appropriate" has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C. sec.
675(11);
(3) "Aggravated circumstances" means the existence of one (1) or more of the
following conditions:
(a) The parent has not attempted or has not had contact with the child for a period
of not less than ninety (90) days;
(b) The parent is incarcerated and will be unavailable to care for the child for a
period of at least one (1) year from the date of the child's entry into foster care
and there is no appropriate relative placement available during this period of
time;
(c) The parent has sexually abused the child and has refused available treatment;
(d) The parent has been found by the cabinet to have engaged in abuse of the
child that required removal from the parent's home two (2) or more times in
Page 12 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
the past two (2) years; or
(e) The parent has caused the child serious physical injury;
(4) "Alternative to secure detention" means any program that provides a less
restrictive environment than a secure juvenile detention facility, is operated by or
contracted through the Department of Juvenile Justice, and is approved for use
pursuant to Section 2 of this Act;
(5) "Beyond the control of parents" means a child who has repeatedly failed to follow
the reasonable directives of his or her parents, legal guardian, or person exercising
custodial control or supervision other than a state agency, which behavior results in
danger to the child or others, and which behavior does not constitute behavior that
would warrant the filing of a petition under KRS Chapter 645;
(6)[(5)] "Beyond the control of school" means any child who has been found by the
court to have repeatedly violated the lawful regulations for the government of the
school as provided in KRS 158.150, and as documented in writing by the school as
a part of the school's petition or as an attachment to the school's petition. The
petition or attachment shall describe the student's behavior and all intervention
strategies attempted by the school;
(7)[(6)] "Boarding home" means a privately owned and operated home for the
boarding and lodging of individuals which is approved by the Department of
Juvenile Justice or the cabinet for the placement of children committed to the
department or the cabinet;
(8)[(7)] "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(9)[(8)] "Certified juvenile facility staff" means individuals who meet the
qualifications of, and who have completed a course of education and training in
juvenile detention developed and approved by, the Department of Juvenile Justice
after consultation with other appropriate state agencies;
(10)[(9)] "Child" means any person who has not reached his or her eighteenth birthday,
Page 13 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
unless otherwise provided;
(11)[(10)] "Child-caring facility" means any facility or group home other than a state
facility, Department of Juvenile Justice contract facility or group home, or one
certified by an appropriate agency as operated primarily for educational or medical
purposes, providing residential care on a twenty-four (24) hour basis to children not
related by blood, adoption, or marriage to the person maintaining the facility;
(12)[(11)] "Child-placing agency" means any agency, other than a state agency, which
supervises the placement of children in foster family homes or child-caring
facilities or which places children for adoption;[
(12) "Clinical treatment facility" means a facility with more than eight (8) beds
designated by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet for the treatment of
mentally ill children. The treatment program of such facilities shall be supervised
by a qualified mental health professional;]
(13) "Commitment" means an order of the court which places a child under the custodial
control or supervision of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, Department
of Juvenile Justice, or another facility or agency until the child attains the age of
eighteen (18) unless otherwise provided by law;
(14) ["Community-based facility" means any nonsecure, homelike facility licensed,
operated, or permitted to operate by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the
cabinet, which is located within a reasonable proximity of the child's family and
home community, which affords the child the opportunity, if a Kentucky resident,
to continue family and community contact;
(15) ]"Complaint" means a verified statement setting forth allegations in regard to the
child which contain sufficient facts for the formulation of a subsequent petition;
(15)[(16)] "Court" means the juvenile session of District Court unless a statute specifies
the adult session of District Court or the Circuit Court;
(16)[(17)] "Court-designated worker" means that organization or individual delegated by
Page 14 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
the Administrative Office of the Courts for the purposes of placing children in
alternative placements prior to arraignment, conducting preliminary investigations,
and formulating, entering into, and supervising diversion agreements and
performing such other functions as authorized by law or court order;
(17)[(18)] "Deadly weapon" has the same meaning as it does in KRS 500.080;
(18)[(19)] "Department" means the Department for Community Based Services;
(19)[(20)] "Dependent child" means any child, other than an abused or neglected child,
who is under improper care, custody, control, or guardianship that is not due to an
intentional act of the parent, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or
supervision of the child;
(20)[(21)] "Detention" means the safe and temporary housing[custody] of a juvenile
who is accused of conduct subject to the jurisdiction of the court who requires a
restricted or closely supervised environment for his or her own or the community's
protection;
(21)[(22)] "Detention hearing" means a hearing held by a judge or trial commissioner
within twenty-four (24) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, of the start of
any period of detention prior to adjudication;
(22)[(23)] "Diversion agreement" means a mechanism designed to hold a child
accountable for his or her behavior and, if appropriate, securing services to serve
the best interests[interest] of the child and to provide redress for that behavior
without court action and without the creation of a formal court record;
(23)[(24)] "Eligible youth" means a person who:
(a) Is or has been committed to the cabinet as dependent, neglected, or abused;
(b) Is eighteen (18) years of age to nineteen (19) years of age; and
(c) Is requesting to extend or reinstate his or her commitment to the cabinet in
order to participate in state or federal educational programs or to establish
independent living arrangements;
Page 15 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
(24)[(25)] "Emergency shelter" is a group home, private residence, foster home, or
similar homelike facility which provides temporary or emergency care of children
and adequate staff and services consistent with the needs of each child;
(25)[(26)] "Emotional injury" means an injury to the mental or psychological capacity or
emotional stability of a child as evidenced by a substantial and observable
impairment in the child's ability to function within a normal range of performance
and behavior with due regard to his or her age, development, culture, and
environment as testified to by a qualified mental health professional;
(26)[(27)] "Evidence-based practices" means policies, procedures, programs, and
practices proven by scientific research to reliably produce reductions in recidivism;
(27)[(28)] "Fictive kin" means an individual who is not related by birth, adoption, or
marriage to a child, but who has an emotionally significant relationship with the
child, or an emotionally significant relationship with a biological parent, siblings, or
half-siblings of the child in the case of a child from birth to twelve (12) months of
age, prior to placement;
(28)[(29)] "Firearm" shall have the same meaning as in KRS 237.060 and 527.010;
(29)[(30)] "Foster family home" means a private home in which children are placed for
foster family care under supervision of the cabinet or a licensed child-placing
agency;
(30)[(31)] "Graduated sanction" means any of a continuum of accountability measures,
programs, and sanctions, ranging from less restrictive to more restrictive in nature,
that may include but are not limited to:
(a) Electronic monitoring;
(b) Drug and alcohol screening, testing, or monitoring;
(c) Day or evening reporting centers;
(d) Reporting requirements;
(e) Community service; and
Page 16 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
(f) Rehabilitative interventions such as family counseling, substance abuse
treatment, restorative justice programs, and behavioral or mental health
treatment;
(31) "Group home" means a community-based and homelike residential treatment
facility for committed youth operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice;
(32) "Habitual runaway" means any child who has been found by the court to have been
absent from his or her place of lawful residence without the permission of his or her
custodian for at least three (3) days during a one (1) year period;
(33) "Habitual truant" means any child who has been found by the court to have been
reported as a truant as defined in KRS 159.150(1) two (2) or more times during a
one (1) year period;
(34) "Hospital" means, except for purposes of KRS Chapter 645, a licensed private or
public facility, health care facility, or part thereof, which is approved by the cabinet
to treat children;
(35) "Independent living" means those activities necessary to assist a committed child to
establish independent living arrangements;
(36) "Informal adjustment" means an agreement reached among the parties, with
consultation, but not the consent, of the victim of the crime or other persons
specified in KRS 610.070 if the victim chooses not to or is unable to participate,
after a petition has been filed, which is approved by the court, that the best
interests[interest] of the child would be served without formal adjudication and
disposition;
(37) "Intentionally" means, with respect to a result or to conduct described by a statute
which defines an offense, that the actor's conscious objective is to cause that result
or to engage in that conduct;
(38) "Least restrictive alternative" means, except for purposes of KRS Chapter 645, that
the program developed on the child's behalf is no more harsh, hazardous, or
Page 17 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
intrusive than necessary; or involves no restrictions on physical movements nor
requirements for residential care except as reasonably necessary for the protection
of the child from physical injury; or protection of the community, and is conducted
at the suitable available facility closest to the child's place of residence to allow for
appropriate family engagement;
(39) "Motor vehicle offense" means any violation of the nonfelony provisions of KRS
Chapters 186, 189, or 189A, KRS 177.300, 304.39-110, or 304.39-117;
(40) "Near fatality" means an injury that, as certified by a physician, places a child in
serious or critical condition;
(41) "Needs of the child" means necessary food, clothing, health, shelter, and education;
(42) "Nonoffender" means a child alleged to be dependent, neglected, or abused and
who has not been otherwise charged with a status or public offense;
(43)[ "Nonsecure facility" means a facility which provides its residents access to the
surrounding community and which does not rely primarily on the use of physically
restricting construction and hardware to restrict freedom;
(44) "Nonsecure setting" means a nonsecure facility or a residential home, including a
child's own home, where a child may be temporarily placed pending further court
action. Children before the court in a county that is served by a state operated
secure detention facility, who are in the detention custody of the Department of
Juvenile Justice, and who are placed in a nonsecure alternative by the Department
of Juvenile Justice, shall be supervised by the Department of Juvenile Justice;
(45)] "Out-of-home placement":
(a) Means a placement other than in the home of a parent, relative, or guardian, in
a boarding home,[ clinical] treatment facility[, community-based facility],
detention facility, emergency shelter, fictive kin home, foster family home,
hospital, secure juvenile detention[ nonsecure facility, physically secure]
facility, residential treatment facility, or[ youth] alternative to secure
Page 18 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
detention program; and[center]
(b) Does not include a placement paid for by a parent, relative, or guardian;
(44)[(46)] "Parent" means the biological or adoptive mother or father of a child;
(45)[(47)] "Person exercising custodial control or supervision" means a person or agency
that has assumed the role and responsibility of a parent or guardian for the child, but
that does not necessarily have legal custody of the child;
(46)[(48)] "Petition" means a verified statement, setting forth allegations in regard to the
child, which initiates formal court involvement in the child's case;
(47)[(49)] "Physical injury" means substantial physical pain or any impairment of
physical condition;[
(50) "Physically secure facility" means a facility that relies primarily on the use of
construction and hardware such as locks, bars, and fences to restrict freedom;]
(48)[(51)] "Public offense action" means an action, excluding contempt, brought in the
interest of a child who is accused of committing an offense under KRS Chapter 527
or a public offense which, if committed by an adult, would be a crime, whether the
same is a felony, misdemeanor, or violation, other than an action alleging that a
child sixteen (16) years of age or older has committed a motor vehicle offense;
(49)[(52)] "Qualified mental health professional" means:
(a) A physician licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or
osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while
engaged in the performance of official duties;
(b) A psychiatrist licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or
osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while
engaged in the practice of official duties, and who is certified or eligible to
apply for certification by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology,
Inc.;
(c) A psychologist with the health service provider designation, a psychological
Page 19 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
practitioner, a certified psychologist, or a psychological associate licensed
under the provisions of KRS Chapter 319;
(d) A licensed registered nurse with a master's degree in psychiatric nursing from
an accredited institution and two (2) years of clinical experience with
mentally ill persons, or a licensed registered nurse with a bachelor's degree in
nursing from an accredited institution who is certified as a psychiatric and
mental health nurse by the American Nurses Association and who has three
(3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in psychiatric nursing
and who is currently employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility
licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general hospital, a
private agency or company engaged in providing mental health services, or a
regional comprehensive care center;
(e) A licensed clinical social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.100, or a certified social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.080 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in
psychiatric social work and currently employed by a hospital or forensic
psychiatric facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a psychiatric unit of a
general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in providing mental
health services, or a regional comprehensive care center;
(f) A marriage and family therapist licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.300 to 335.399 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical
experience in psychiatric mental health practice and currently employed by a
hospital or forensic psychiatric facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a
psychiatric unit of a general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in
providing mental health services, or a regional comprehensive care center;
(g) A professional counselor credentialed under the provisions of KRS 335.500 to
335.599 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in
Page 20 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
psychiatric mental health practice and currently employed by a hospital or
forensic facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a psychiatric unit of a
general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in providing mental
health services, or a regional comprehensive care center; or
(h) A physician assistant licensed under KRS 311.840 to 311.862, who meets one
(1) of the following requirements:
1. Provides documentation that he or she has completed a psychiatric
residency program for physician assistants;
2. Has completed at least one thousand (1,000) hours of clinical experience
under a supervising physician, as defined by KRS 311.840, who is a
psychiatrist and is certified or eligible for certification by the American
Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.;
3. Holds a master's degree from a physician assistant program accredited
by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the
Physician Assistant or its predecessor or successor agencies, is
practicing under a supervising physician as defined by KRS 311.840,
and:
a. Has two (2) years of clinical experience in the assessment,
evaluation, and treatment of mental disorders; or
b. Has been employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility
licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general
hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision
of mental health services or a regional community program for
mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability for at
least two (2) years; or
4. Holds a bachelor's degree, possesses a current physician assistant
certificate issued by the board prior to July 15, 2002, is practicing under
Page 21 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
a supervising physician as defined by KRS 311.840, and:
a. Has three (3) years of clinical experience in the assessment,
evaluation, and treatment of mental disorders; or
b. Has been employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility
licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general
hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision
of mental health services or a regional community program for
mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability for at
least three (3) years;
(50)[(53)] "Reasonable and prudent parent standard" has the same meaning as in 42
U.S.C. sec. 675(10);
(51)[(54)] "Residential treatment facility" means a facility or group home with more
than eight (8) beds designated by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet
for the treatment of children;
(52)[(55)] "Retain in custody" means, after a child has been taken into custody, the
continued holding of the child by a peace officer for a period of time not to exceed
twelve (12) hours when authorized by the court or the court-designated worker for
the purpose of making preliminary inquiries;
(53)[(56)] "Risk and needs assessment" means an actuarial tool scientifically proven to
identify specific factors and needs that are related to delinquent and noncriminal
misconduct;
(54)[(57)] "Safety plan" means a written agreement developed by the cabinet and agreed
to by a family that clearly describes the protective services that the cabinet will
provide the family in order to manage risks to a child's safety;
(55)[(58)] "School personnel" means those certified persons under the supervision of the
local public or private education agency;
(56)[(59)] "Secretary" means the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family
Page 22 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
Services;
(57)[(60)] "Secure juvenile detention facility" means any[ physically secure] facility
used for the secure detention of children other than any facility in which adult
prisoners are confined;
(58)[(61)] "Serious physical injury" means physical injury which creates a substantial
risk of death or which causes serious and prolonged disfigurement, prolonged
impairment of health, or prolonged loss or impairment of the function of any bodily
member or organ;
(59)[(62)] "Sexual abuse" includes but is not necessarily limited to any contacts or
interactions in which the parent, guardian, person in a position of authority or
special trust, as defined in KRS 532.045, or other person having custodial control or
supervision of the child or responsibility for his or her welfare, uses or allows,
permits, or encourages the use of the child for the purposes of the sexual
stimulation of the perpetrator or another person;
(60)[(63)] "Sexual exploitation" includes but is not limited to a situation in which a
parent, guardian, person in a position of authority or special trust, as defined in
KRS 532.045, or other person having custodial control or supervision of a child or
responsible for his or her welfare, allows, permits, or encourages the child to
engage in an act:
(a) Which constitutes prostitution under Kentucky law; or[ a parent, guardian,
person in a position of authority or special trust, as defined in KRS 532.045,
or other person having custodial control or supervision of a child or
responsible for his or her welfare, allows, permits, or encourages the child to
engage in an act]
(b) Of obscene or pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child as
provided for under Kentucky law;
(61)[(64)] "Social service worker" means any employee of the cabinet or any private
Page 23 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
agency designated as such by the secretary of the cabinet or a social worker
employed by a county or city who has been approved by the cabinet to provide,
under its supervision, services to families and children;[
(65) "Staff secure facility for residential treatment" means any setting which assures that
all entrances and exits are under the exclusive control of the facility staff, and in
which a child may reside for the purpose of receiving treatment;]
(62)[(66)] "Statewide reporting system" means a system for making and compiling
reports of child dependency, neglect, and abuse in Kentucky made via telephone
call or in writing by a member of the public;
(63)[(67)] (a) "Status offense action" is any action brought in the interest of a child
who is accused of committing acts, which if committed by an adult, would not
be a crime. Such behavior shall not be considered criminal or delinquent and
such children shall be termed status offenders. Status offenses shall include:
1. Beyond the control of school or beyond the control of parents;
2. Habitual runaway;
3. Habitual truant; and
4. Alcohol offenses as provided in KRS 244.085.
(b) Status offenses shall not include violations of state or local ordinances which
may apply to children such as a violation of curfew;
(64)[(68)] "Take into custody" means the procedure by which a peace officer or other
authorized person initially assumes custody of a child. A child may be taken into
custody for a period of time not to exceed two (2) hours;
(65)[(69)] "Transitional living support" means all benefits to which an eligible youth is
entitled upon being granted extended or reinstated commitment to the cabinet by the
court;
(66)[(70)] "Transition plan" means a plan that is personalized at the direction of the
youth that:
Page 24 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
(a) Includes specific options on housing, health insurance, education, local
opportunities for mentors and continuing support services, and workforce
supports and employment services; and
(b) Is as detailed as the youth may elect;
(67)[(71)] "Valid court order" means a court order issued by a judge to a child alleged or
found to be a status offender:
(a) Who was brought before the court and made subject to the order;
(b) Whose future conduct was regulated by the order;
(c) Who was given written and verbal warning of the consequences of the
violation of the order at the time the order was issued and whose attorney or
parent or legal guardian was also provided with a written notice of the
consequences of violation of the order, which notification is reflected in the
record of the court proceedings; and
(d) Who received, before the issuance of the order, the full due process rights
guaranteed by the Constitution of the United States;
(68)[(72)] "Violation" means any offense, other than a traffic infraction, for which a
sentence of a fine only can be imposed;
(69)[(73)] "Youth alternative center" means a[ nonsecure] facility, operated by a local
government and approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice, for the detention
of juveniles, both prior to adjudication and after adjudication, which meets the
criteria specified in KRS 15A.320;
(70) "Youth development center" means a residential treatment facility for committed
youth operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice; and
(71)[(74)] "Youthful offender" means any person regardless of age, transferred to Circuit
Court under the provisions of KRS Chapter 635 or 640 and who is subsequently
convicted in Circuit Court.
Section 4. KRS 610.265 is amended to read as follows:
Page 25 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
(1) (a) Any child who is alleged to be a status offender or who is accused of being in
contempt of court on an underlying finding that the child is a status offender
may be detained in[ a nonsecure facility or] a secure juvenile detention facility
or in another facility approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice for a
period of time not to exceed twenty-four (24) hours, exclusive of weekends
and holidays, pending a detention hearing.
(b) Any child who is accused of committing a public offense or of being in
contempt of court on an underlying public offense may be detained in a secure
juvenile detention facility or another facility[a nonsecure setting] approved
by the Department of Juvenile Justice for a period of time not to exceed forty-
eight (48) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, pending a detention
hearing.
(2) [Beginning July 1, 2024, ]Any child accused of committing a public offense that
would[ be considered] classify the child as a violent offender under KRS
439.3401[a violent felony offense as defined in KRS 532.200] shall be detained in a
secure juvenile detention facility for a period of time not to exceed forty-eight (48)
hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, pending a detention hearing, unless the
detention hearing can be held within the time allotted to peace officers to retain
custody of the child pursuant to KRS 610.200 or 610.220. This subsection shall not
apply to any child ten (10) years of age or younger.
(3) (a) Any child detained pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be assessed
by a mental health professional, whose communications with the child shall
be confidential in conformity with the Kentucky Rules of Evidence, to
determine if the child exhibits behavior that indicates the child could benefit
from cognitive behavioral therapy, other evidence-based behavioral health
programs, substance use disorder treatment, or treatment in a psychiatric
facility for serious mental illness.
Page 26 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
(b) Any treatment recommended under this subsection shall be provided by the
Department of Juvenile Justice and may be provided pursuant to a contract
between the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet and a behavioral health
services organization.
(c) If the child is released upon a detention hearing, a court may order the child to
complete any recommended treatment. The Department of Juvenile Justice
shall refer the child to an existing contractor or to other resources for the
treatment.
(4) Any child detained pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be permitted
visitation from individuals representing organizations including nonprofit
organizations, faith-based organizations, or community organizations, to connect
them with, expose them to, or minister to them through programs including but not
limited to trades, arts, sports, mentoring, counseling, support programs, or
community-based programs. These organizations may offer transition services to
any child who is released from detention.
(5) Within the period of detention described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
exclusive of weekends and holidays, a detention hearing shall be held by the judge
or trial commissioner of the court for the purpose of determining whether the child
shall be further detained. At the hearing held pursuant to this subsection, the court
shall consider the nature of the offense, the child's background and history, and
other information relevant to the child's conduct or condition.
(6) If the court orders a child detained further, that detention shall be served as follows:
(a) If the child is charged with a capital offense, Class A felony, or Class B
felony, detention shall occur in a secure juvenile detention facility pending the
child's next court appearance subject to the court's review of the detention
order prior to that court appearance;
(b) Except as provided in KRS 630.080(2), if it is alleged that the child is a status
Page 27 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
offender, the child may be detained in a secure juvenile detention facility for a
period not to exceed twenty-four (24) hours after which detention shall occur
in an alternative to secure detention program[a nonsecure setting] approved
by the Department of Juvenile Justice pending the child's next court
appearance subject to the court's review of the detention order prior to the
next court appearance;
(c) If a status offender or a child alleged to be a status offender is charged with
violating a valid court order, the child may be detained in a secure juvenile
detention facility, or in another facility[a nonsecure setting] approved by the
Department of Juvenile Justice, for a period not to exceed forty-eight (48)
hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, pending the child's next court
appearance;
(d) Prior to ordering a status offender or alleged status offender who is subject to
a valid court order securely detained because the child violated the valid court
order, the court shall:
1. Affirm that the requirements for a valid court order were met at the time
the original order was issued;
2. Make a determination during the adjudicatory hearing that the child
violated the valid court order; and
3. Within forty-eight (48) hours after the adjudicatory hearing on the
violation of a valid court order by the child, exclusive of weekends and
holidays, receive and review a written report prepared by an appropriate
public agency that reviews the behavior of the child and the
circumstances under which the child was brought before the court,
determines the reasons for the child's behavior, and determines whether
all dispositions other than secure detention have been exhausted or are
inappropriate. If a prior written report is included in the child's file, that
Page 28 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
report shall not be used to satisfy this requirement. The child may be
securely detained for a period not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours,
exclusive of weekends and holidays, pending receipt and review of the
report by the court. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with
KRS 610.060. The findings required by this paragraph[subsection]
shall be included in any order issued by the court which results in the[
secure or nonsecure] detention of a status offender; and
(e) If the child is charged with a public offense, or contempt on a public offense,
and the county in which the case is before the court is served by a state
operated secure detention facility under the statewide detention plan, the child
shall be referred to the Department of Juvenile Justice for a security
assessment and placement in an approved detention facility or program
pending the child's next court appearance.
(7) If, at the hearing conducted under subsection (5) of this section, the court conducts
an adjudicatory hearing on the merits of a violation of a valid court order, that
hearing shall conform to the requirements of KRS 630.080.
(8) If the detention hearing is not held as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the
child shall be released as provided in KRS 610.290.
(9) If the child is not released, the court-designated worker shall notify the parent,
person exercising custodial control or supervision, a relative, guardian, or other
responsible adult, and the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, as
appropriate.
Section 5. KRS 610.340 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Unless a specific provision of KRS Chapters 600 to 645 specifies otherwise,
all juvenile[ court] records of any nature generated pursuant to KRS Chapters
600 to 645 by any agency or instrumentality, public or private, shall be
deemed to be confidential and shall not be disclosed except to the child,
Page 29 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
parent, victims, or other persons authorized to attend a juvenile court hearing
pursuant to KRS 610.070 unless ordered by the court for good cause.
(b) Juvenile[ court] records which contain information pertaining to arrests,
petitions, adjudications, and dispositions of a child may be disclosed to
victims or other persons authorized to attend a juvenile court hearing pursuant
to KRS 610.070.
(c) Release of the child's treatment, medical, mental, or psychological records is
prohibited unless presented as evidence in Circuit Court. Any records
resulting from the child's prior abuse and neglect under Title IV-E or Title IV-
B of the Federal Social Security Act shall not be disclosed to victims or other
persons authorized to attend a juvenile court hearing pursuant to KRS
610.070.
(d) Victim access under this subsection to juvenile court records shall include
access to records of adjudications that occurred prior to July 15, 1998.
(2) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to public officers or employees
engaged in the investigation of and in the prosecution of cases under KRS Chapters
600 to 645 or other portions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes. Any record obtained
pursuant to this subsection shall be[ used] for official use only, shall not be
disclosed publicly, and shall be exempt from disclosure under the Open Records
Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(3) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to any peace officer, as defined in
KRS 446.010, who is engaged in the investigation or prosecution of cases under
KRS Chapters 600 to 645 or other portions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes. Any
record obtained pursuant to this subsection shall be[ used] for official use only,
shall not be disclosed publicly, and shall be exempt from disclosure under the Open
Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(4) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to employees of the Department of
Page 30 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
Juvenile Justice or cabinet or its designees responsible for any services under KRS
Chapters 600 to 645, or to attorneys for parties involved in actions relating to KRS
Chapters 600 to 645, or other prosecutions authorized by the Kentucky Revised
Statutes. Any records obtained by an individual designated in this subsection may
be used by the individual in the course and scope of his or her employment or
representation but shall not be disclosed to any third party without a court order.
(5) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to records disclosed pursuant to
KRS 610.320 or to public or private elementary and secondary school
administrative, transportation, and counseling personnel, to any teacher or school
employee with whom the student may come in contact, or to persons entitled to
have juvenile records under KRS 610.345, if the possession and use of the records
is in compliance with[ the provisions of] KRS 610.345 and this section.
(6) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to employees of local law
enforcement agencies, the Department of Kentucky State Police, or the Federal
Bureau of Investigation engaged in conducting background checks for the sole
purpose of identifying and providing potentially disqualifying juvenile public
offense records to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System
pursuant to Div. A, Title II, Sec. 12001(a) of the Bipartisan Safer Communities Act,
Pub. L. No. 117-159. Notwithstanding KRS 635.040, an adjudication for a public
offense is a conviction of a crime for purposes of 18 U.S.C. sec. 922(d)(1), (3), or
(9). Any public offense record obtained pursuant to this subsection shall be used for
official use only, not be disclosed publicly, and be exempt from disclosure under
the Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(7) (a) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to records or proceedings in
any case in which a child has made an admission to or been adjudicated for an
offense that would classify the child as a violent offender under KRS
439.3401[a violent felony offense as defined in KRS 532.200] until the
Page 31 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
expiration of a three (3) year period from the date of admission or
adjudication.
(b) If the child has not received any additional public offense convictions during
the three (3) year period from the date of admission or adjudication, all
records in the case shall be automatically sealed and shall not be disclosed
consistent with[ the provisions of] this section.
(c) As used in this subsection, "admission" means a formal admission in a case,
on the record, upon the waiving of an adjudication hearing.
(8) A[No] person, including school personnel, shall not disclose any confidential record
or any information contained in the confidential record[therein] except as
permitted by this section or other specific section of KRS Chapters 600 to 645, or
except as permitted by specific order of the court.
(9) A[No] person, including school personnel, authorized to obtain records pursuant to
KRS Chapters 600 to 645 shall not obtain or attempt to obtain confidential records
to which he or she is not entitled or for purposes for which he or she is not
permitted to obtain them pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645.
(10) A[No] person, including school personnel, not authorized to obtain records pursuant
to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 shall not obtain or attempt to obtain records which are
made confidential pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 except upon proper motion
to a court of competent jurisdiction.
(11) A[No] person shall not destroy or attempt to destroy any record required to be kept
pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 unless the destruction is permitted pursuant to
KRS Chapters 600 to 645 and is authorized by the court upon proper motion and
good cause for the destruction being shown.
(12) As used in this section the term "KRS Chapters 600 to 645" includes any
administrative regulations which are lawfully promulgated in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A and pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645.
Page 32 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
(13) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed to prohibit a crime victim from
speaking publicly after the adjudication about his or her case on matters within his
or her knowledge or on matters disclosed to the victim during any aspect of a
juvenile court proceeding.
(14) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Department of
Juvenile Justice may publicly release information regarding a child if the child
absconds or escapes from a Department of Juvenile Justice facility or placement
to assist in securing the safe return of the child. Information released by the
Department of Juvenile Justice may include:
(a) The child's:
1. Name and home county of residence;
2. Physical description; and
3. Photograph;
(b) The name of the facility from which the child absconded or escaped; and
(c) A statement that the public should exercise caution and should notify law
enforcement immediately if the child is seen.
(15) Any information that is publicly released regarding a child pursuant to
subsection (14) of this section shall be immediately removed from public access
upon request from the Department of Juvenile Justice.
Section 6. KRS 645.280 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] child held under[ the provisions of] this chapter shall not be held in a secure
juvenile detention facility unless a status offense action or public offense action is
also pending[. No peace officer or any other person shall bring a status offense
action or a public offense action against a child who is mentally ill and in need of
hospitalization pursuant to this chapter solely or primarily for the purpose of
avoiding transporting the child to a hospital, mental health facility, or other less
restrictive alternative].
Page 33 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
(2) If, after evaluation, the qualified mental health professional finds that the child does
not meet the criteria for involuntary hospitalization and the peace officer has reason
to believe that the child has committed a status offense or public offense, the peace
officer may proceed in accordance with KRS 610.190 to 610.290.
Section 7. KRS 15A.0652 is amended to read as follows:
The Department of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate administrative regulations that shall
include:
(1) Development or adoption of a validated risk and needs assessment that:
(a) Considers factors such as the severity of the current offense, the child's
previous public offense record, and the child's assessed criminal risk factors;
(b) Is administered for all children adjudicated on a public offense prior to
disposition and at regular intervals thereafter to determine risk levels and to
identify intervention needs; and
(c) Is implemented based on policies and practices for utilization of the
assessment instrument to objectively guide placement and the length and type
of treatment for each child committed to the department or probated to the
department or other entity;
(2) The provision of treatment for committed and probated children in accordance with
evidence-based practices, including, at a minimum:
(a) Development of a case plan for each child committed to the department or
probated to the department that targets the risk factors identified in the
assessment, is responsive to individual characteristics, involves the family as
appropriate, provides supervision or monitoring of children according to their
case plan, and establishes a treatment plan in accordance with subsection (3)
of this section; and
(b) Development and implementation of a graduated sanctions protocol of swift,
certain, proportionate, and graduated sanctions that a probation officer or
Page 34 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
employee of the department shall apply in response to a child's violations of
the terms or conditions of probation. The graduated sanctions protocol shall:
1. Include a continuum of sanctions that take into account factors such as
the severity of the current violation, the child's previous criminal record,
the number and severity of any previous probation violations, the child's
assessed risk level, and the extent to which graduated sanctions were
imposed for previous violations. The system shall also define positive
reinforcements that the probated child may receive for compliance with
his or her terms or conditions of probation. A sanction of up to thirty
(30) days' out-of-home placement may be imposed for a violation of the
terms of probation. A child shall not be committed or recommitted to the
Department of Juvenile Justice for the violation of the conditions of
probation;
2. Provide that judicial review for a probated youth, or an administrative
hearing for a committed youth, shall not be necessary to impose
graduated sanctions less than out-of-home placement; and
3. Require that less-restrictive graduated sanctions be utilized prior to
requesting judicial review unless there is clear and convincing evidence
that there are no graduated sanctions available that are appropriate for
the child and the child is an immediate threat to himself, herself, or
others;
(3) Development and implementation of treatment plans for committed and probated
children that:
(a) Take into consideration the severity of the current offense and the child's
assessed risk and needs as identified by a validated risk and needs assessment;
(b) Involve the family in the treatment plan as appropriate;
(c) Allow a child to complete treatment in the community if resources are
Page 35 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
available rather than in a[ secure or nonsecure] facility; and
(d) For committed children may include:
1. A maximum of four (4) months of out-of-home placement if the child
was adjudicated for an offense that would be a misdemeanor if
committed by an adult, other than a violation of KRS Chapter 510 or an
offense involving a deadly weapon;
2. A maximum of eight (8) months of out-of-home placement if the child
was adjudicated for an offense that would be a Class D felony if
committed by an adult, other than a violation of KRS Chapter 510 or an
offense involving a deadly weapon; and
3. A provision that if a child has reached the maximum time allowed in
out-of-home placement, as specified in subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this
paragraph and further out-of-home placement is determined to be
necessary for completion of treatment, the child may be held for an
additional period only upon approval of the Administrative Transfer
Request Committee, or another appropriate entity within the department
as designated by the commissioner of the department after review of the
facts and circumstances warranting the need for continued out-of-home
placement. If the commissioner approves continued out-of-home
placement, the maximum time the placement may be continued is the
maximum originally allowed under subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this
paragraph and the total period of commitment shall not exceed that
permitted under KRS 635.060;
(4) Development and implementation of professional development programs for
department staff who interact with or who are responsible for the treatment,
supervision, or placement of children, that includes training on juvenile justice
research relating to effectiveness of juvenile justice interventions, impacts of out-
Page 36 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
of-home placement, alternatives to incarceration, use of graduated sanctions, case
planning, administration of a validated risk and needs assessment, and training to
address specific issues such as domestic violence, trauma, and family engagement;
(5) Development of procedures for measuring the outcomes of each treatment and
intervention program and practice to demonstrate that the program or practice has a
documented evidence base and has been evaluated for effectiveness in reducing
recidivism for the children it serves, including:
(a) A process for reviewing the objective criteria for evidence-based programs
and practices established by the agency providing the program;
(b) A process for auditing the effectiveness of the programs; and
(c) An opportunity for programs that do not meet the criteria based on the audit
results to develop and implement a corrective action plan within one hundred
eighty (180) days of the audit;
(6) Development of procedures to track juvenile recidivism, which shall include
adjudication of a new public offense or conviction of a crime within three (3) years
of release from an out-of-home placement or release from commitment, and
collaboration with the Department of Corrections and the Administrative Office of
the Courts to obtain adult conviction and incarceration information to enable
collection of recidivism data;
(7) Development of procedures to track the pre-adjudication and post-adjudication
admissions beginning no later than August 1, 2014; and
(8) Development of procedures to ensure maximum utilization of available federal
funding resources which may be available to the agency.
As used in this section, "evidence-based practices," "graduated sanction," "out-of-home
placement," and "risk and needs assessment" have the same meanings as in KRS 600.020.
Section 8. KRS 15A.200 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 15A.210 to 15A.240 and KRS 15A.990:
Page 37 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
(1) "Certified juvenile facility staff" means individuals who meet the qualifications of,
and who have completed a course of education and training developed and
approved by, the Department of Juvenile Justice;
(2) "Secure juvenile detention facility" means any facility used for the secure detention
of children other than a jail, police station, lockup, or any building which is a part
of or attached to any facility in which adult prisoners are confined or which shares
staff with a facility in which adult prisoners are confined;
(3) "Youth alternative center" means a[ nonsecure] facility, operated by a local
government and approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice, for the[
nonsecure] detention of juveniles, both prior to adjudication and after
adjudication, which meets the criteria specified in Section 9 of this Act; and
(4) The term "facility" or "facilities" as used in KRS 15A.210 to 15A.240 shall mean
the facilities defined in this section.
Section 9. KRS 15A.320 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any county government, urban-county government, consolidated local
government, unified local government, or charter county government may apply to
the Department of Juvenile Justice to construct, operate, or contract for the
operation of a youth alternative center.
(2) The youth alternative center[ shall be a nonsecure facility and] shall be under the
jurisdiction of that governing body, subject to[ the provisions of] this chapter.
(3) The youth alternative center shall be used only for the detention of juveniles. The
youth alternative center shall not be part of a county jail or other facility that houses
adult offenders.
(4) The youth alternative center may be used as a place of detention for juveniles by
order of a court prior to adjudication and after adjudication regardless of whether
the child is a status offender, public offender, or youthful offender.
Section 10. KRS 508.025 is amended to read as follows:
Page 38 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
(1) A person is guilty of assault in the third degree when the actor:
(a) Recklessly, with a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument, or intentionally
causes or attempts to cause physical injury to:
1. A state, county, city, or federal peace officer;
2. An employee of a detention facility[,] or state residential treatment
facility[ or state staff secure facility for residential treatment] which
provides for the care, treatment, or detention of a juvenile charged with
or adjudicated delinquent because of a public offense or as a youthful
offender;
3. A healthcare provider as defined in KRS 311.821 or other person
employed by or under contract with a health clinic, doctor's office,
dental office, long-term care facility, hospital, or a hospital-owned or
affiliate outpatient facility, if the event occurs in or on the premises of a
health clinic, doctor's office, dental office, long-term care facility,
hospital, or a hospital-owned or affiliate outpatient facility;
4. An employee of the Department for Community Based Services
employed as a social worker to provide direct client services, if the
event occurs while the worker is performing job-related duties;
5. Paid or volunteer emergency medical services personnel certified or
licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 311A, if the event occurs while
personnel are performing job-related duties;
6. A paid or volunteer member of an organized fire department, if the
event occurs while the member is performing job-related duties;
7. Paid or volunteer rescue squad personnel affiliated with the Division of
Emergency Management of the Department of Military Affairs or a
local disaster and emergency services organization pursuant to KRS
Chapter 39F, if the event occurs while personnel are performing job-
Page 39 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
related duties;
8. A probation and parole officer;
9. A transportation officer appointed by a county fiscal court or legislative
body of a consolidated local government, urban-county government, or
charter government to transport inmates when the county jail or county
correctional facility is closed while the transportation officer is
performing job-related duties;
10. A public or private elementary or secondary school or school district
classified or certified employee, school bus driver, or other school
employee acting in the course and scope of the employee's employment;
or
11. A public or private elementary or secondary school or school district
volunteer acting in the course and scope of that person's volunteer
service for the school or school district;
(b) Being a person confined in a detention facility, or a juvenile in a state
residential treatment facility,[ or state staff secure facility for residential
treatment] which provides for the care, treatment, or detention of a juvenile
charged with or adjudicated delinquent because of a public offense or as a
youthful offender, inflicts physical injury upon or throws or causes feces, or
urine, or other bodily fluid to be thrown upon an employee of the facility; or
(c) Intentionally causes a person, whom the actor knows or reasonably should
know to be a peace officer discharging official duties, to come into contact
with saliva, vomit, mucus, blood, seminal fluid, urine, or feces without the
consent of the peace officer.
(2) (a) For a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, assault in the third degree
is a Class D felony, unless the offense occurs during a declared emergency as
defined by KRS 39A.020 arising from a natural or man-made disaster, within
Page 40 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
the area covered by the emergency declaration, and within the area impacted
by the disaster, in which case it is a Class C felony.
(b) For a violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section, assault in the third degree
is a Class D felony.
(c) For violations of subsection (1)(c) of this section, assault in the third degree is
a Class B misdemeanor, unless the assault is with saliva, vomit, mucus, blood,
seminal fluid, urine, or feces from an adult who knows that he or she has a
serious communicable disease and competent medical or epidemiological
evidence demonstrates that the specific type of contact caused by the actor is
likely to cause transmission of the disease or condition, in which case it is a
Class A misdemeanor.
(d) As used in paragraph (c) of this subsection, "serious communicable disease"
means a non-airborne disease that is transmitted from person to person and
determined to have significant, long-term consequences on the physical health
or life activities of the person infected.
Section 11. KRS 610.012 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The District Court or the family division of the Circuit Court shall have exclusive
jurisdiction of proceedings under this section.
(2) Proceedings to temporarily detain a child suspected of being a runaway by means of
an emergency protective custody order, pending further appropriate court action,
shall be initiated by filing a complaint with the court-designated worker.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a child who is
suspected of being a runaway may be detained in an alternative to secure detention
program[a nonsecure facility] for a period of time not to exceed seventy-two (72)
hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, or, if the court makes a finding on the
record that no less restrictive alternative is available, in a secure juvenile detention
facility for a period of time not to exceed twenty-four (24) hours, exclusive of
Page 41 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
weekends and holidays, pursuant to an ex parte emergency protective order pending
a court hearing to determine whether to return the child to his or her custodian or
give custody of the child to the cabinet.
(4) If, at the hearing held as provided for in subsection (3) of this section, the child is
not released, the court shall issue an emergency custody order pursuant to KRS
Chapter 620 and place the child with the cabinet and the cabinet shall file a
dependency, neglect, or abuse action.
(5) All hearings subsequent to the issuance of an emergency custody order shall be in
accordance with KRS Chapter 620.
(6) If the child is released, except to the cabinet pursuant to an emergency custody
order, the court-designated worker shall initiate a status offense case.
(7) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to a child coming under the purview
of KRS Chapter 615.
Section 12. KRS 610.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a peace officer has taken or received a child into custody on a charge of
committing an offense, the officer shall immediately inform the child of his or her
constitutional rights and afford the child[him] the protections required thereunder,
notify the parent, or if the child is committed, the Department of Juvenile Justice or
the cabinet, as appropriate, and if the parent is not available, then a relative,
guardian, or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child, that the
child has been taken into custody, give an account of specific charges against the
child, including the specific statute alleged to have been violated, and the reasons
for taking the child into custody.
(2) (a) When a peace officer has taken or received a child into protective custody on
suspicion of being a runaway, the officer shall immediately notify:
1. The child's parent, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or
supervision of the child, if determined;
Page 42 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
2. The cabinet or Department of Juvenile Justice, if appropriate; and
3. The court-designated worker.
(b) If the parent, guardian, or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision is identified and notified, the peace officer may retain custody of
the child for a reasonable period to allow the person notified the opportunity
to arrive at the officer's location and collect the child.
(c) If the parent, guardian, or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision cannot be identified or located, the peace officer may retain
custody of the child for a period of time not to exceed two (2) hours to
continue his or her investigation.
(d) If, at the conclusion of the peace officer's investigation, the parent, guardian,
or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child is identified
and notified, the peace officer shall return the child to the custody of that
person and shall file a status offense case with the court-designated worker.
(e) If, at the conclusion of the peace officer's investigation, the parent, guardian,
or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child cannot be
identified or located, or that person refuses to collect the child, the peace
officer shall file a complaint pursuant to KRS 610.012.
(3) Unless the child is subject to trial as an adult or unless the nature of the offense or
other circumstances are such as to indicate the necessity of retaining the child in
custody, the officer shall release the child to the custody of his or her parent or if
the child is committed, the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, as
appropriate; or if the parent is not available, then a relative, guardian, or person
exercising custodial control or supervision or other responsible person or agency
approved by the court upon the written promise, signed by such person or agency,
to bring the child to the court at a stated time or at such time as the court may order.
The written promise, accompanied by a written report by the officer, shall be
Page 43 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
submitted immediately[forthwith] to the court or court-designated worker and shall
detail the reasons for having taken custody of the child, the release of the child, the
person to whom the child was released, and the reasons for the release.
(4) (a) If the person fails to produce the child as agreed, or upon notice from the
Court as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a summons, warrant, or
custody order may be issued for the apprehension of the person or of the
child, or both.
(b) If the person notified to collect a suspected runaway pursuant to subsection
(2)(a) of this section fails or refuses to collect the child, the peace officer shall
notify the county attorney, who may file a charge of endangering the welfare
of a minor, and the cabinet.
(5) The release of a child pursuant to this section shall not preclude a peace officer
from proceeding with a complaint against a child or any other person.
(6) Unless the child is subject to trial as an adult, if the child is not released, the peace
officer shall contact the court-designated worker who may:
(a) Release the child to his or her parents;
(b) Release the child to such other persons or organizations as are authorized by
law;
(c) Release the child to either of the above subject to stated conditions; or
(d) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, authorize the peace
officer to retain custody of the child for an additional period not to exceed
twelve (12) hours during which the peace officer may transport the child to a
secure juvenile detention facility or another[a nonsecure] facility. If the child
is retained in custody, the court-designated worker shall give notice to the
child's parents or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the fact
that the child is being retained in custody.
(7) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a[no] child ten (10)
Page 44 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
years of age or under shall not be taken to or placed in a juvenile detention
facility.
(b) Any child ten (10) years of age or under who has been charged with the
commission of a capital offense or with an offense designated as a Class A or
Class B felony may be taken to or placed in a secure juvenile detention
facility or youth alternative center when there is no available less restrictive
alternative.
Section 13. KRS 610.220 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by statute, if an officer takes or receives a child into
custody on an allegation of committing a public offense or into protective custody
on being a suspected runaway, the child may be held at a police station, secure
juvenile detention facility, youth alternative center, another[a nonsecure] facility,
or, as necessary, in a hospital or clinic for the following purposes:
(a) Identification and booking;
(b) Attempting to notify the parents or person exercising custodial control or
supervision of the child, a relative, guardian, other responsible person, or the
cabinet;
(c) Photographing;
(d) Fingerprinting;
(e) Physical examinations, including examinations for evidence;
(f) Evidence collection, including scientific tests;
(g) Records checks;
(h) Determining whether the child is subject to trial as an adult; and
(i) Other inquiries of a preliminary nature.
(2) A child may be held in custody pursuant to this section for a period of time not to
exceed two (2) hours, unless an extension of time is granted. Permission for an
extension of time may be granted by the court, trial commissioner, or court-
Page 45 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
designated worker pursuant to KRS 610.200(6)(d) and the child may be retained in
custody for up to an additional ten (10) hours at a facility of the type listed in
subsection (1) of this section except for an intermittent holding facility for the
period of retention.
(3) Any child held in custody pursuant to this section shall be sight and sound separated
from any adult prisoners held in secure custody at the same location, and shall not
be handcuffed to or otherwise securely attached to any stationary object.
Section 14. KRS 620.095 is amended to read as follows:
A nonoffender, as defined in KRS 600.020, shall not be placed in[ secure or nonsecure]
detention.
Section 15. KRS 630.040 is amended to read as follows:
Any person taking a child into custody, with all reasonable speed, shall in this sequence:
(1) Deliver the child suffering from a physical condition or illness which requires
prompt medical treatment to a medical facility or physician. Children suspected of
having a mental or emotional illness shall be evaluated in accordance with[ the
provisions of] KRS Chapter 645 or as provided under Section 1 of this Act;
(2) Contact a court designated worker who shall have the responsibility for determining
appropriate placement pursuant to KRS 610.200(5);
(3) If the court designated worker determines that the placements designated in KRS
610.200(5) and subsection (1) of this section have been exhausted or are not
appropriate, a child may be delivered to a secure juvenile detention facility, a
juvenile holding facility, or another facility[a nonsecure setting] approved by the
Department of Juvenile Justice pending the detention hearing;
(4) When the child has not been released to his or her parents or person exercising
custodial control or supervision, the person taking the child into custody shall make
a reasonable effort promptly to give oral notice to the parent or person exercising
custodial control or supervision of the child;
Page 46 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
(5) In all instances the peace officer taking a child into custody shall provide a written
statement to the court designated worker of the reasons for taking the child into
custody;
(6) If the child is placed in an emergency shelter or medical facility, during the
adjudication and disposition of his or her case, the court may order the child's[his]
parents to be responsible for the expense of the child's[his] care; and
(7) The peace officer taking the child into custody shall within three (3) hours of taking
a child into custody file a complaint with the court, stating the basis for taking the
child into custody and the reason why the child was not released to the parent or
other adult exercising custodial control or supervision of the child, relative or other
responsible adult, a court designated agency, an emergency shelter or medical
facility. Pending further disposition of the case, the court or the court designated
worker may release the child to the custody of any responsible adult who can
provide adequate care and supervision.
Section 16. KRS 630.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In order for the court to detain a child after the detention hearing, the
Commonwealth shall establish probable cause at the detention hearing that the child
is a status offender and that further detention of the child is necessary for the
protection of the child or the community. If the Commonwealth fails to establish
probable cause that the child is a status offender, the complaint shall be dismissed
and the child shall be released. If the Commonwealth establishes probable cause
that the child is a status offender, but that further detention of the child is not
necessary for the protection of the child or the community, the child shall be
released to the parent or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the
child. If grounds are established that the child is a status offender, and that further
detention is necessary, the child may be placed in an alternative to secure
detention program[a nonsecure setting] approved by the Department of Juvenile
Page 47 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
Justice;
(2) A status offender may be securely detained if the cabinet has initiated or intends to
initiate transfer of the youth by competent document under[ the provisions of] the
interstate compact pursuant to KRS Chapter 615;
(3) The appropriate public agency shall:
(a) Within twenty-four (24) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, of
receiving notification, as provided in KRS 15A.305[(3)], that a status offender
or alleged status offender has been detained on the allegation that the child
has violated a valid court order, meet with and interview the child; and
(b) Within forty-eight (48) hours, exclusive of weekend and holidays, of the
detention hearing required under KRS 610.265, prepare and deliver to the
court the completed written report required by subsection (4) of this section
and KRS 610.265 if the child remains in detention after the detention hearing,
and prior to the disposition hearing if the child has not been detained; and
(4) A status offender or alleged status offender who is subject to a valid court order
may be securely detained upon a finding that the child violated the valid court order
if the court does the following prior to ordering that detention:
(a) Affirms that the requirements for a valid court order were met at the time the
original order was issued;
(b) Makes a determination during the adjudicatory hearing that the child violated
the valid court order; and
(c) Within forty-eight (48) hours after the adjudicatory hearing on the violation of
a valid court order by the child, exclusive of weekends and holidays, the court
receives and reviews a written report prepared by an appropriate public
agency that reviews the behavior of the child and the circumstances under
which the child was brought before the court, determines the reasons for the
child's behavior, and determines whether all dispositions other than secure
Page 48 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
detention have been exhausted or are inappropriate. If a prior written report is
included in the child's file, that report shall not be used to satisfy this
requirement. The child may be securely detained for a period not to exceed
forty-eight (48) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, pending receipt
and review of the report by the court. The hearing shall be conducted in
accordance with[ the provisions of] KRS 610.060. The findings required by
this subsection shall be included in any order issued by the court which results
in the[ secure or nonsecure] detention of a status offender.
Section 17. KRS 630.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any[Notwithstanding any provision of KRS Chapter 520 to the contrary, no] child
who:
(a) Is accused of being a status offender;[or who ]
(b) Has been adjudicated as a status offender; or
(c) [who ]Has been accused of or held in contempt of court based upon an
underlying finding that the child is a status offender; and
(d) [who ]Is absent without leave from a facility operated by the Department of
Juvenile Justice;
may be charged with escape under KRS Chapter 520.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of KRS Chapter 520 to the contrary, a child who
is absent without leave from[nonsecure detention option or] home detention, or
who fails to report or comply with the conditions of supervised placement, shall not
be charged with escape[ for being absent without leave or failing to comply with the
conditions of supervised placement].
Section 18. KRS 635.055 is amended to read as follows:
A[No] child who is found to be in contempt of court shall not be committed as a public
offender as a result of the[such] finding, and shall not be[nor] detained because of
the[such] finding in a facility other than a secure juvenile detention facility, youth
Page 49 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
alternative center, an alternative to secure detention program approved by the
Department of Juvenile Justice, or in another placement approved by the Department of
Justice[a nonsecure detention alternative]. An order of detention for a child found in
contempt shall not exceed thirty (30) days.
Section 19. KRS 645.020 is amended to read as follows:
The definitions in KRS Chapter 600 shall apply to this chapter. In addition, unless the
context requires otherwise:
(1) "Convalescent leave" means an authorized release not to exceed ninety (90) days of
a child admitted to a hospital under this chapter;
(2) "Danger to self or others" means that it is shown by substantial proof that in the
near future the child may attempt suicide or may cause substantial physical harm or
threat of substantial physical harm to self or others, as evidenced by recent threats
or overt acts, including acts by which the child deprives self or others of the basic
means of survival, including reasonable shelter, food or clothing. In determining
whether a child presents a danger to self, factors to be considered shall include, but
shall not be limited to, an established pattern of past dangerous behavior;
(3) "Hospital" means a licensed private or public institution, health care facility, or part
thereof, approved by the cabinet to treat children who are mentally ill;
(4) "Least restrictive alternative" means the treatment and conditions of treatment for a
child which, separately and in combination:
(a) Are no more harsh, hazardous or intrusive than necessary to achieve
acceptable treatment objectives for the child; and
(b) Involve no inpatient care restrictions on physical movement except as
reasonably necessary for the administration of treatment or for the protection
of the child or others from physical injury.
In determining the least restrictive alternative, factors to be considered shall
include, but not be limited to, the likelihood, based on the child's prior outpatient
Page 50 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
treatment, that the child will benefit from outpatient treatment;
(5) "Mental health facility" means a residential or nonresidential service providing
children psychological or psychiatric treatment for emotional, mental, or behavioral
problems;
(6) "Mental health group home" means a[ community-based] facility established to
serve not less than four (4) nor more than eight (8) mentally ill children with a
treatment program developed and supervised by a qualified mental health
professional. Mental health group homes shall not be adjacent to or part of a
residential treatment facility or a hospital;
(7) "Mental health professional" means:
(a) A physician licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or
osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while
engaged in conducting mental health services;
(b) A psychiatrist licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or
osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States
engaged in conducting mental health services;
(c) A psychologist, a psychological practitioner, a certified psychologist, or a
psychological associate, licensed under the provisions of KRS Chapter 319;
(d) A registered nurse licensed under the provisions of KRS Chapter 314 engaged
in providing mental health services;
(e) A licensed clinical social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.100, or a certified social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.080 engaged in providing mental health services;
(f) A marriage and family therapist licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.300 to 335.399 engaged in providing mental health services;
(g) A professional counselor credentialed under the provisions of KRS Chapter
335.500 to 335.599 engaged in providing mental health services;
Page 51 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
(h) An art therapist certified under KRS 309.130 engaged in providing mental
health services; or
(i) A pastoral counselor licensed under the provisions of KRS 335.600 to
335.699 engaged in providing mental health services; and
(8) "Mentally ill child" means that considering the child's age and development, the
child has a substantially impaired capacity to use self-control, judgment or
discretion in the conduct of the child's affairs and social relations, the child's
behavior is maladaptive or the child exhibits recognized emotional symptoms which
can be related to physiological, psychological or social factors.
Section 20. KRS 645.210 is amended to read as follows:
(1) After a notice of contest has been received, the hospital may continue the
hospitalization on an involuntary basis until a hearing has been held and the court
orders otherwise. In no case may the child be held more than fifteen (15) days
beyond the filing of the notice of contest, unless a certification hearing has been
held within seven (7) days of the filing of the notice of contest.
(2) A hearing to determine the necessity for continued hospitalization shall be held
within seven (7) days of the court's receipt of the notice of the contest. If the court
concludes that the child does not meet the criteria set out in KRS 645.090, the court
may order the child discharged or may enter an emergency custody order for
purposes of proceeding under other provisions of KRS Chapter 600 to 645 to secure
proper care for the child. The cabinet may place the child in a[ clinical] treatment
facility, mental health group home, or mental health care program.
Section 21. KRS 403.727 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any petition filed under KRS 403.725 on behalf of a minor who is alleged to be a
victim of domestic violence and abuse, or in which a minor is named as a
respondent or petitioner, shall comply with the requirements in that section and
shall:
Page 52 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
(a) Proceed in accordance with the procedural safeguards under KRS 610.070;
and
(b) Conform to the confidentiality provisions under KRS 610.340.
(2) If the court orders an evidentiary hearing under KRS 403.730(1)(a), a guardian ad
litem shall be appointed for any unrepresented minor who is a respondent to the
action or a petitioner who is an alleged victim of domestic violence and abuse. The
guardian ad litem shall be paid a fee fixed by the court not to exceed five hundred
dollars ($500), which shall be paid by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
(3) Violation of the terms or conditions of an order of protection issued under KRS
403.740 after the person has been served or given notice of the order shall
constitute contempt of court and may constitute a criminal offense pursuant to KRS
403.763 if the offender is an adult or a public offense under KRS 600.020[(51)] if
the offender is a juvenile. Once a juvenile action or contempt proceeding has been
initiated, the other shall not be undertaken regardless of the outcome of the original
proceeding.
(4) [Nothing in ]Subsection (3) of this section shall not preclude the Commonwealth
from proceeding, or the petitioner from pursuing charges, against the minor
respondent for offenses other than a violation of an order of protection. Proceedings
against a minor respondent for offenses other than a violation of an order of
protection shall proceed:
(a) In the juvenile session of District Court; and
(b) In accordance with the procedural and statutory provisions established for the
juvenile session of District Court.
Section 22. KRS 456.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any petition filed under KRS 456.030 on behalf of a minor who is an alleged
victim of dating violence and abuse, sexual assault, or stalking, or in which a minor
is named as a respondent or petitioner, shall comply with the requirements in that
Page 53 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
section and shall:
(a) Proceed in accordance with the procedural safeguards under KRS 610.070;
and
(b) Conform to the confidentiality provisions under KRS 610.340.
(2) If the court orders an evidentiary hearing under KRS 456.040(1)(a), a guardian ad
litem shall be appointed for any unrepresented minor who is a respondent to the
action or a petitioner who is an alleged victim of dating violence and abuse, sexual
assault, or stalking. The guardian ad litem shall be paid a fee fixed by the court not
to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), which shall be paid by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet.
(3) Violation of the terms or conditions of an order of protection issued under KRS
456.060 after the person has been served or given notice of the order shall
constitute contempt of court and may constitute a criminal offense pursuant to KRS
456.180 if the offender is an adult or a public offense under KRS 600.020[(51)] if
the offender is a juvenile. Once a juvenile action or contempt proceeding has been
initiated, the other shall not be undertaken regardless of the outcome of the original
proceeding.
(4) [Nothing in ]Subsection (3) of this section shall not preclude the Commonwealth
from proceeding, or the petitioner from pursuing charges, against the minor
respondent for offenses other than a violation of an order of protection. Proceedings
against a minor respondent for offenses other than a violation of an order of
protection shall proceed:
(a) In the juvenile session of District Court; and
(b) In accordance with the procedural and statutory provisions established for the
juvenile session of District Court.
Section 23. The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall construct a high acuity
mental health facility to provide residential treatment for children in the custody of the
Page 54 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 125/GA
Department of Juvenile Justice. The facility shall provide beds for a minimum of 24
children and shall be designed in a manner that shall allow for additions to the facility to
increase bed capacity as needed. The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall work with
the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to ensure compliance with all health facility
requirements, both federal and state. The provisions of this section, and the provisions of
subsection (1)(b)5. of Section 2 of this Act, are subject to funding in the executive branch
budget.
Section 24. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall provide or enter
into contracts or a memorandum of understanding with a public teaching university in
this state to provide clinical services to the high acuity health facility operated by the
Justice and Public Safety Cabinet through the Department of Juvenile Justice.
Section 25. The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall continue to implement
the plan to transition back to the regional model of juvenile detention facilities, and to
construct two female-only facilities as described in Section 2 of this Act, while
continuing to safely segregate males and females and violent and nonviolent offenders.
Page 55 of 55
SB012510.100 - 1631 - XXXX 3/2/2026 5:52 PM GA